Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
PERMIT SYSTEM FOR HAZARDOUS MATERIALS

42-20-201. Hazardous materials transportation permit required.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2021.

]

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, no transportation of hazardous materials by motor vehicle which requires placarding under 49 CFR part 172 or 173 shall take place in, to, from, or through this state until the public utilities commission issues a permit, in accordance with the provisions of this part 2, authorizing the applicant to operate or move upon the public roads of this state a motor vehicle or a combination of motor vehicles which carries hazardous materials. This part 2 shall not apply to motor vehicles owned by the federal government, motor vehicles when used to transport to or from the farm or ranch site products used for agricultural production, or farm machinery which is exempted from registration requirements by section 42-3-103, unless such vehicles are used in furtherance of any commercial business other than agriculture. This part 2 shall apply to motor vehicles owned by the state or any political subdivision thereof; except that such vehicles shall be exempt from the fees provided in section 42-20-202. The requirements of this part 2 shall be in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other provisions of law.

42-20-201. Hazardous materials transportation permit required.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2021.

]

Except as otherwise provided in this part 2, no transportation of hazardous materials by motor vehicle which requires placarding under 49 CFR part 172 or 173 shall take place in, to, from, or through this state until the department of transportation issues a permit, in accordance with the provisions of this part 2, authorizing the applicant to operate or move upon the public roads of this state a motor vehicle or a combination of motor vehicles which carries hazardous materials. This part 2 does not apply to motor vehicles owned by the federal government, motor vehicles when used to transport to or from the farm or ranch site products used for agricultural production, or farm machinery which is exempted from registration requirements by section 42-3-103, unless such vehicles are used in furtherance of any commercial business other than agriculture. This part 2 applies to motor vehicles owned by the state or any political subdivision thereof; except that such vehicles are exempt from the fees provided in section 42-20-202. The requirements of this part 2 are in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other provisions of law.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2522, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 662, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-201 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-202. Transportation permit - application fee.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2021.]

Except as otherwise provided in this section, each person desiring to transport hazardous materials which require placarding under 49 CFR part 172 or 173 in, to, from, or through this state shall submit a permit application for an annual permit to the public utilities commission prior to beginning such transportation. Permit applications shall be in a form designated by the public utilities commission, and the public utilities commission shall maintain records of all such applications.

Each annual permit shall be valid for one year following its issuance and shall be issued after the approval of the permit application by the public utilities commission and upon the payment of a permit fee, which fee shall be based on the number of motor vehicles the applicant operates within this state, as follows:

Single trip permits may be obtained at all port of entry weigh stations and from the Colorado state patrol. Each person transporting such hazardous materials in, to, from, or through this state who has not obtained an annual permit from the public utilities commission shall apply at the closest possible port of entry weigh station or to an officer or office of the Colorado state patrol for a single trip permit. Each single trip permit shall be valid for a single continuous business venture, but in no event shall the permit be valid for more than seventy-two hours, unless extended by any enforcement official for any reason the official deems advisable, including mechanical difficulties and road and weather conditions. The single trip permit shall be issued upon the approval of the permit application and upon the payment of a twenty-five-dollar permit fee.

The public utilities commission shall provide the option to a company filing for a permit under this subsection (1) to file an express consent waiver that enables the company to designate a company representative to be a party of interest for a violation of this section. The appearance of the company representative in a court hearing without the operator when the operator has signed such waiver shall not be deemed the practice of law in violation of article 93 of title 13.

(1) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2021.]

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each person desiring to transport hazardous materials which require placarding under 49 CFR part 172 or 173 in, to, from, or through this state shall submit a permit application for an annual permit to the department of transportation before beginning such transportation. Permit applications must be in a form designated by the department, and the department shall maintain records of all such applications.

(b) Each annual permit is valid for one year following its issuance and shall be issued after the approval of the permit application by the department of transportation and upon the payment of a permit fee, which fee must be based on the number of motor vehicles the applicant operates within this state, as follows:

(c) Single trip permits may be obtained at all port of entry weigh stations. Each person transporting hazardous materials in, to, from, or through this state who has not obtained an annual permit from the department of transportation shall apply at the closest possible port of entry weigh station or at a department of transportation office for a single trip permit. Each single trip permit is valid for a single continuous business venture, but in no event shall the permit be valid for more than seventy-two hours, unless extended by any enforcement official for any reason the official deems advisable, including mechanical difficulties and road and weather conditions. A single trip permit shall be issued upon the approval of the permit application and upon the payment of a twenty-five-dollar permit fee.

(d) The department of transportation shall provide the option to a company filing for a permit under this subsection (1) to file an express consent waiver that enables the company to designate a company representative to be a party of interest for a violation of this section. The appearance of the company representative in a court hearing without the operator when the operator has signed such waiver shall not be deemed the practice of law in violation of article 93 of title 13.

No annual permit application shall be approved unless the applicant:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective until January 1, 2021.] Supplies proof of having obtained liability insurance as required by the United States department of transportation pursuant to 49 CFR 387. Proof of such liability insurance policy shall be filed with the public utilities commission. The insurance carrier shall give thirty days' written notice for nonpayment of premium and ninety days' notice for nonrenewal of policy to the public utilities commission before the cancellation of such policy. At any time that the insurance policy lapses, the permit shall be automatically revoked.

(a)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a) is effective January 1, 2021.

]

Supplies proof of having obtained liability insurance as required by the United States department of transportation pursuant to 49 CFR 387. Proof of such liability insurance policy shall be filed with the department of transportation. The insurance carrier shall give thirty days' written notice for nonpayment of premium and ninety days' notice for nonrenewal of policy to the department before the cancellation of such policy. At any time that the insurance policy lapses, the permit shall be automatically revoked.

Agrees to comply with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to section 42-20-108.

No single trip permit application shall be approved unless the applicant:

Supplies proof of having liability insurance as required by the United States department of transportation pursuant to 49 CFR 387 or signs a verification under the penalty of perjury as provided in section 42-3-122 that the applicant has the liability insurance as required by the United States department of transportation pursuant to 49 CFR 387;

Agrees to comply with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to section 42-20-108.

The chief is authorized to promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable in governing the issuance of permits, if such rules and regulations are not in conflict with other provisions of state law.

Any fees collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the hazardous materials safety fund created in section 42-20-107.

Number of

Motor Vehicles

Permit Fee

1 - 5
$ 10
6 - 10
25
11 - 50
125
51 - 100
200
101 - 300
350
over 300
400

Number of

Motor Vehicles

Permit Fee

1 - 5
$ 10
6 - 10
25
11 - 50
125
51 - 100
200
101 - 300
350
over 300
400

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2522, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1180, § 25, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1)(d) added, p. 310, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 17-227), ch. 192, p. 705, § 9, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 662, § 2, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-202 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-203. Carrying of permit and shipping papers.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2021.] Any person transporting hazardous materials that require placarding under 49 CFR part 172 or 173 in this state shall carry a copy of the shipping papers required in 49 CFR 172.200 and a copy of the hazardous materials transportation permit issued by the public utilities commission or by the Colorado state patrol at a port of entry weigh station in the transporting motor vehicle while in this state; except that, if a peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., or any other enforcement official may determine that the hazardous materials transportation permit can be electronically verified at the time of contact, a copy of the permit need not be carried by the person transporting hazardous materials. The permit shall be open to inspection or electronic verification by any enforcement official.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2021.

]

Any person transporting hazardous materials that require placarding under 49 CFR part 172 or 173 in this state shall carry a copy of the shipping papers required in 49 CFR 172.200 and a copy of the hazardous materials transportation permit issued by the department of transportation or, before January 1, 2021, by the public utilities commission or by the Colorado state patrol at a port of entry weigh station in the transporting motor vehicle while in this state; except that, if a peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, or any other enforcement official determines that the hazardous materials transportation permit can be electronically verified at the time of contact, a copy of the permit need not be carried by the person transporting hazardous materials. The permit is open to inspection or electronic verification by any enforcement official.

In the event of an accident involving hazardous materials, the operator of the motor vehicle shall provide the shipping papers to the emergency response authorities designated in or pursuant to article 22 of title 29, C.R.S., and immediately bring to their attention the fact that the motor vehicle is carrying hazardous materials.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2523, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 583, § 4, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1212, § 102, effective August 4.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 472, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1) amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 664, § 3, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-203 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-204. Permit violations - penalties.

Any person who transports hazardous materials without a permit in violation of any of the provisions of section 42-20-201 commits a misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be assessed a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars in accordance with the procedure set forth in section 42-20-105 (2). Any person who intentionally transports hazardous materials without a permit in violation of any of the provisions of section 42-20-201 commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S. For the purposes of this subsection (1), if any person who previously has acknowledged guilt or has been convicted of a misdemeanor pursuant to this subsection (1) subsequently transports hazardous materials without a permit in violation of any of the provisions of section 42-20-201, a permissive inference is created that such subsequent transportation without a permit was intentional.

Any person who has obtained an annual or a single trip hazardous materials transportation permit but fails to have a copy of said permit in the cab of the motor vehicle while transporting hazardous materials in, to, from, or through this state commits a class B traffic infraction and shall be assessed a penalty of twenty-five dollars in accordance with the procedure set forth in section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(V); except that, if a peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., or any other enforcement official may determine that the permit can be electronically verified at the time of contact, a copy of the permit need not be in the cab of the motor vehicle.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the terms and conditions of an annual or single trip hazardous materials transportation permit commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

All penalties collected pursuant to this section by a state agency or by a court shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the hazardous materials safety fund created in section 42-20-107.

Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under this section shall forward to the chief a record of the conviction of any person in said court for a violation of any said laws within forty-eight hours after such conviction. The term "conviction" means a final conviction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2524, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1565, § 384, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 583, § 5, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1212, § 103, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-204 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1) and (3), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-20-205. Permit suspension or revocation.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2021.

]

In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties, the public utilities commission may suspend the hazardous materials transportation annual permit for a period not to exceed six months or may revoke such permit for failure to comply with the terms and conditions of such permit, for failure to pay a civil penalty assessed pursuant to section 42-20-204, or for continuing violations of the regulations promulgated pursuant to part 1, 2, or 3 of this article. The permit may be suspended or revoked only for good cause shown after due notice and an opportunity for a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., if requested by the permit holder.

42-20-205. Permit suspension or revocation - rules.

[

Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2021.

]

In addition to any other civil or criminal penalties, for violations occurring after March 16, 2020, the department of transportation may suspend a hazardous materials transportation annual permit for a period not to exceed six months or may revoke a permit for failure to comply with the terms and conditions of the permit, for failure to pay a civil penalty assessed pursuant to section 42-20-204, or for continuing violations of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to part 1, 2, or 3 of this article 20. The permit may be suspended or revoked only for good cause shown after due notice and an opportunity for a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, if requested by the permit holder. The department may promulgate rules, subject to the requirements of article 4 of title 24, to establish specific procedures for suspension or revocation of permits and the conduct of permit suspension and revocation hearings.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2524, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-118), ch. 155, p. 664, § 4, effective January 1, 2021.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-205 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-20-206. Local government preemption.

No county, city and county, city, or town shall establish any permit or fee system for the transportation of hazardous materials by motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2525, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-6-206 as it existed prior to 1994.